Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.36.350.
Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to a person who practices, or offers or attempts to practice, dentistry in the state except

a dental surgeon or dentist in the military service in the discharge of official duties;

a dentist in the employ of the United States Public Health Service, United States Department of Veterans Affairs, United States Indian Health Service, or other agency of the federal government, in the discharge of official duties;

a dentist licensed in another state who is teaching or demonstrating clinical techniques at a meeting, seminar, or limited course of instruction sponsored by a dental or dental auxiliary society or association or by an accredited dental or dental auxiliary educational institution;

a dentist licensed in another state who provides emergency care to an injured or ill person who reasonably appears to the dentist to be in immediate need of emergency aid in order to avoid serious harm or death if the care is provided without remuneration;

a dentist employed in the state by an Indian health program, as that term is defined in 25 U.S.C. 1603, while providing dental services to a person the Indian health program is entitled to serve under 25 U.S.C. 450 et seq. (Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act), as amended, and 25 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Indian Health Care Improvement Act), as amended.

A person excepted from this chapter under (a) of this section shall be held to the same standard of care as a person covered by this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 art I ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1965; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 32 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 37 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 13 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 37 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For special permits, see 7 AAC 27, art. 9.

Editor’s notes. —

Paragraph (4) of this section refers to 25 U.S.C. 450 et seq., which was renumbered in 2016 as 25 U.S.C. 5301, et seq., by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Opinions of attorney general. —

So long as they are employed by Native Health clinics and treat patients authorized to receive care in those clinics, individuals certified as dental health aides by the federal Community Health Aide Certification Board do not have to comply with state dental licensure laws. The state dental licensure laws stand as an obstacle to Congress’ objective to provide dental treatment to Alaska Natives by using non-dentist, non-hygienist paraprofessionals. Therefore, the federal statute that mandates the development of the dental health aide standards and the certification of dental health aides displaces (or preempts) the state’s dental licensure law and renders it unenforceable against federally-certified dental health aides. September 8, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 08.36.355.
Maximum dosage for opioid prescriptions.

A licensee may not issue

an initial prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven-day supply to an adult patient for outpatient use;

a prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven-day supply to a minor; at the time a licensee writes a prescription for an opioid for a minor, the licensee shall discuss with the parent or guardian of the minor why the prescription is necessary and the risks associated with opioid use.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a licensee may issue a prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven-day supply to an adult or minor patient if, in the professional judgment of the licensee, more than a seven-day supply of an opioid is necessary for

the patient’s chronic pain management; the licensee may write a prescription for an opioid for the quantity needed to treat the patient’s medical condition or chronic pain; the licensee shall document in the patient’s medical record the condition triggering the prescription of an opioid in a quantity that exceeds a seven-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition; or

a patient who is unable to access a practitioner within the time necessary for a refill of the seven-day supply because of a logistical or travel barrier; the licensee may write a prescription for an opioid for the quantity needed to treat the patient for the time that the patient is unable to access a practitioner; the licensee shall document in the patient’s medical record the reason for the prescription of an opioid in a quantity that exceeds a seven-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition; in this paragraph, “practitioner” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

.

In this section,

“adult” means

an individual who has reached 18 years of age; or

an emancipated minor;

“emancipated minor” means a minor whose disabilities have been removed for general purposes under AS

09.55.590

;

“minor” means an individual under 18 years of age who is not an emancipated minor.

History.

(§ 5 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent regarding this section, see sec. 1, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 08.36.360.
Practice of dentistry defined.

A person engages in the practice of dentistry who

performs or holds out to the public as being able to perform dental operations;

diagnoses, treats, operates on, corrects, attempts to correct, or prescribes for a disease, lesion, pain, injury, deficiency, deformity, or physical condition, malocclusion or malposition of the human teeth, alveolar process, gingiva, maxilla, mandible, or adjacent tissues;

performs or attempts to perform an operation incident to the replacement of teeth;

furnishes, supplies, constructs, reproduces, or repairs dentures, bridges, appliances or other structures to be used and worn as substitutes for natural teeth, except on prescription of a duly licensed and registered dentist and by the use of impressions or casts made by a duly licensed and registered dentist;

uses the words “dentist” or “dental surgeon” or the letters “D.D.S.” or “D.M.D.” or other letter or title that represents the dentist as engaging in the practice of dentistry;

extracts or attempts to extract human teeth;

exercises control over professional dental matters or the operation of dental equipment in a facility where the acts and things described in this section are performed or done;

evaluates, diagnoses, treats, or performs preventive procedures related to diseases, disorders, or conditions of the oral cavity, maxillofacial area, or adjacent and associated structures; a dentist whose practice includes the services described in this paragraph may only perform the services if they are within the scope of the dentist’s education, training, and experience and in accord with the generally recognized ethical precepts of the dental profession; nothing in this paragraph requires a person licensed under AS 08.64 to be licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 art I ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 38 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 9 ch 24 SLA 2001)

Cross references. —

For professional designation requirements for dentists, see AS

08.02.010

.

Administrative Code. —

For professional practices, see 12 AAC 28, art. 7.

Sec. 08.36.365.
Rights of dentists.

A dentist licensed in this state may

practice in an association, partnership, corporation, or other lawful entity with other dentists, including specialists;

practice under the name of “dental center” or other descriptive term that does not deceive the public about the nature of the services provided;

supervise research that would otherwise violate this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter when the research does not involve treatment of dental patients if the research is performed by a nonprofit dental research institution chartered by this state or by a dental or dental auxiliary school accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of the American Dental Association, or its successor agency;

supervise research that would otherwise violate this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter when the research involves the treatment of dental patients if the research is performed by a nonprofit dental research institution chartered by this state or by a dental or dental auxiliary school accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of the American Dental Association, or its successor agency, and if the dentist notifies the board in writing, at least 60 days before beginning the treatment, of the intended practices or procedures and the board does not disapprove the research.

History.

(§ 39 ch 100 SLA 1984)

Sec. 08.36.367.
Ownership of a dental office or facility.

Only a person who holds a valid license issued under this chapter may own, operate, or maintain a dental practice, office, or clinic. This restriction does not apply to

a labor organization or a nonprofit organization formed by or on behalf of a labor organization for the purpose of providing dental services to rural or underserved populations;

an institution of higher education recognized by the board;

a local government;

an institution or program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association to provide education and training;

a nonprofit corporation organized under state law to provide dental services to rural areas and medically underserved populations of migrant, rural community, or homeless individuals under 42 U.S.C. 254b or 254c or health centers qualified under 42 U.S.C. 1396d(l)(2)(B) operating in compliance with other applicable state and federal law;

a nonprofit charitable corporation described in 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code) and determined by the board to be providing dental services by volunteer licensed dentists to populations with limited access to dental care at no charge or a substantially reduced charge.

For the purpose of owning or operating a dental practice, office, or clinic, an entity described in (a) of this section shall

name a licensed dentist as its dental director, who shall be subject to the provisions of AS

08.36.315

and

08.36.317

in the capacity of dental director; the dental director, or an actively licensed dentist designated by the director, shall have responsibility for the entity’s practice of dentistry; and

maintain current records of the names of licensed dentists who supervise dental hygienists, dental assistants, and other personnel involved in direct patient care who are employed by the entity; the records must be available to the board upon written request.

Nothing in this chapter precludes a person or entity not licensed by the board from

ownership or leasehold of any tangible or intangible assets used in a dental office or clinic, including real property, furnishings, equipment, and inventory, but not including dental records of patients related to clinical care;

employing or contracting for the services of personnel other than licensed dentists; or

management of the business aspects of a dental office or clinic that do not include the practice of dentistry.

If all of the ownership interests of a dentist or dentists in a dental office or clinic are held by an administrator, executor, personal representative, guardian, conservator, or receiver of the estate of a former shareholder, member, or partner, the administrator, executor, personal representative, guardian, conservator, or receiver may retain the ownership interest for a period of 24 months following the creation of the ownership interest. The board shall extend the ownership period for an additional 24 months upon 30 days’ notice and may grant additional extensions upon reasonable request.

In this section, “labor organization” means an organization, not for pecuniary profit, constituted wholly or partly to bargain collectively or deal with employers, including the state and its political subdivisions, concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or other mutual aid or protection in connection with employees that has existed for at least three years and that has a constitution and bylaws.

History.

(§ 38 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.36.370.
Definitions for chapter.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“board” means the Board of Dental Examiners;

“calculus” means a hardened deposit of mineralized plaque;

“coronal polishing” means the removal of supragingival plaque and stains;

“dental assistant” means a person employed to provide clinical assistance to a dentist licensed in the state;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“impaired practitioner” means a person who is unfit to practice dentistry due to addiction or dependence on alcohol or other drugs that impair the practitioner’s ability to practice safely;

“licensed dental hygienist” means a dental hygienist licensed under AS 08.32;

“licensed dentist” means a dentist licensed under this chapter;

“opioid” includes the opium and opiate substances and opium and opiate derivatives listed in AS

11.71.140

and

11.71.160

;

“registered dental assistant” means a dental assistant registered under this chapter.

History.

(§ 31 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 122 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 111 SLA 2008; am § 39 ch 53 SLA 2012; am § 6 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Paragraphs (2)-(4) were enacted as paragraphs (4)-(6); renumbered in 2008, at which time paragraphs (2) and (3) were renumbered as (5) and (6).

Paragraph (9) was enacted as (10); renumbered in 2017, at which time paragraph (9) was renumbered as (10).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 26, 2017, added (10) [now (9)].